test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-h1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    eyga+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: eyga
    eyga+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: eyga
    eyga+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: eyga
    eyga+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: eyga
    eyga+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: [eygu, eygur]
    eyga+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: [eygu, eygur]
    eyga+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: eygum
    eyga+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: eygna
    eyga+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: eygað
    eyga+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: eygað
    eyga+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: eyganum
    eyga+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: eygans
    eyga+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: eyguni
    eyga+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: eyguni
    eyga+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: eygunum
    eyga+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: eygnanna
